North Carolina, session 2025, SB805.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), the sum of eighty million
dollars ($80,000,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts beginning in the 2026-2027
fiscal year to be used to increase the Medicaid rate paid for dental services.
SECTION 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
*S805-v-1*